Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3518.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 145.4131, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Forms. (a) Within 90 days of July 1, 1998, the commissioner shall prepare a reporting form for use by physicians or facilities performing abortions. A copy of this section shall be attached to the form. A physician or facility performing an abortion shall obtain a form from the commissioner. (b) The form shall require the following information: (1) the number of abortions performed by the physician in the previous calendar year, reported by month; (2) the method used for each abortion; (3) the approximate gestational age expressed in one of the following increments: (i) less than nine weeks; (ii) nine to ten weeks; (iii) 11 to 12 weeks; (iv) 13 to 15 weeks; (v) 16 to 20 weeks; (vi) 21 to 24 weeks; (vii) 25 to 30 weeks; (viii) 31 to 36 weeks; or (ix) 37 weeks to term; (4) the age of the woman at the time the abortion was performed; (5) complications, if any, for each abortion and for the aftermath of each abortion. Space for a description of any complications shall be available on the form; (6) the medical specialty of the physician performing the abortion; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (7) if the abortion was performed via telehealth, the facility code for the patient and the facility code for the physiciandeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (8) whether the abortion resulted in a born-alive infant, as specified in section 145.423, subdivision 1, and: new text end new text begin (i) the estimated gestational age at which the born-alive infant was born; new text end new text begin (ii) any medical actions taken to preserve the life of the born-alive infant; new text end new text begin (iii) whether the born-alive infant survived; and new text end new text begin (iv) the status of the born-alive infant, should the infant survive, if known. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 145.423, is amended to read: 145.423 deleted text begin RECOGNITION OF INFANT WHO IS BORN ALIVEdeleted text end new text begin ABORTION; LIVE BIRTHSnew text end . Subdivision 1. Recognitiondeleted text begin ; caredeleted text end . An infant who is born alivenew text begin as a result of an abortionnew text end shall be fully recognized as a human persondeleted text begin , and accorded immediate protection under the law. All reasonable measures consistent with good medical practice, including the compilation of appropriate medical records, shall be taken by the responsible medical personnel to care for the infant who is born alivedeleted text end new text begin for whom a certificate of live birth and appropriate medical records shall be compiled and recorded by the responsible medical personnelnew text end . new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Comfort care" means the provision of palliative care that in reasonable medical judgment will meet the hygiene needs of the infant and provide the treatment to control pain and other symptoms to ensure the infant is as comfortable as possible. new text end new text begin (c) "A condition incompatible with sustained life" means a profound and irremediable congenital or chromosomal anomaly or other condition that in reasonable medical judgment will result in the imminent death of the infant, regardless of the provision of measures to preserve the life and health of the infant. new text end new text begin (d) "Measures to preserve the health and life of the infant" means the provision of treatment, including nutrition, hydration, and medication that in reasonable medical judgment is most likely to be effective in ameliorating or correcting the infant's life-threatening and health-harming conditions. new text end new text begin (e) "Reasonable medical judgment" means a medical judgment made by a reasonably prudent physician knowledgeable about the case and the treatment possibilities with respect to the medical conditions involved. new text end new text begin (f) "Perinatal hospice" means comprehensive support to the infant, the parent or parents, and the family from the time of diagnosis through the time of death of the born-alive infant and through the postpartum period. Supportive care may include maternal-fetal medical specialists, obstetricians, neonatologists, anesthesia specialists, clergy, social workers, and specialty nurses. new text end new text begin (g) "Born alive," with respect to a human being, means the complete expulsion or extraction from the mother, at any stage of development, who, after the expulsion or extraction, breathes or has a beating heart, pulsation of the umbilical cord, or definite movement of voluntary muscles, regardless of whether the umbilical cord has been cut and regardless of whether the expulsion or extraction occurs as a result of a natural or induced labor, cesarean section, or induced abortion. new text end new text begin (h) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affirm, deny, expand, or contract any legal status or legal right applicable to any human being at any point prior to being born alive, as defined in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 1b. new text end new text begin Medical care. new text end new text begin When an infant is born alive as a result of an abortion, measures must be taken to preserve the life and health of the infant, as defined in subdivision 1a, paragraph (d), except that when an infant who is born alive as a result of an abortion is diagnosed with a condition incompatible with sustained life as defined in subdivision 1a, paragraph (c), those measures are not required but the requirements of subdivision 1d are applicable and the infant must at minimum be provided with comfort care as defined in subdivision 1a, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin Subd. 1c. new text end new text begin Physician required. new text end new text begin When an abortion is performed after the 20th week of gestational age, a physician other than the medical personnel performing the abortion must be immediately accessible to take responsibility if an infant is born alive as a result of the abortion and for complying with the requirements of subdivisions 1 and 1a. new text end new text begin Subd. 1d. new text end new text begin Perinatal hospice. new text end new text begin (a) Whenever a mother is informed that her unborn infant is diagnosed with a condition incompatible with sustained life as defined in subdivision 1a, paragraph (c), the mother shall be informed by her attending physician or an agent of the physician that perinatal hospice services are available and the mother must be given a copy of the printed materials described in subdivision 1e. This information shall be provided at least 72 hours before an abortion is performed on the unborn infant unless, in reasonable medical judgment, an earlier abortion is necessary to preserve the life of, or to prevent severe and long-lasting physical health damage to, the mother. new text end new text begin (b) Whenever an unborn infant who was not previously diagnosed with a condition incompatible with sustained life before birth is born alive as a result of an abortion and is thereafter diagnosed with a condition incompatible with sustained life, the infant's mother must be given that information and must be informed by her attending physician or an agent of the physician that perinatal hospice services are available. The mother must be given a copy of the printed materials described in subdivision 1e. The unborn infant shall be transferred to the care of perinatal hospice services if the infant's mother decides to transfer care. new text end new text begin Subd. 1e. new text end new text begin Information about perinatal hospice to be compiled. new text end new text begin The commissioner must publish, and update at least annually, geographically indexed materials describing available public and private agencies and health care facilities that offer perinatal hospice and palliative care. The materials must be easily understood and include a comprehensive list of the agencies available, a description of the services they offer, and a description of the manner in which they may be contacted. The commissioner must develop and maintain a stable website that also provides this information. No individually identifiable information regarding who uses the website shall be collected or maintained. new text end new text begin Subd. 1f. new text end new text begin Death. new text end new text begin If a born-alive infant described in subdivision 1 dies after birth, the body shall be disposed of in accordance with the provisions of section 145.1621. new text end new text begin Subd. 1g. new text end new text begin Civil and disciplinary actions. new text end new text begin (a) Any person upon whom an abortion has been performed, or the parent or guardian of a minor child upon whom an abortion has been performed, where the abortion results in a born-alive infant may bring an action to recover damages for death of or injury to the born-alive infant against the person who performed the abortion if the death or injury was a result of negligence, gross negligence, wanton or willful conduct, intentional conduct, or any other violation of the legal standard of care. new text end new text begin (b) Any responsible medical personnel who do not take all reasonable measures consistent with good medical practice to preserve the life and health of the born-alive infant, as required by subdivision 1, may be subject to the suspension or revocation of that person's professional license by the professional board with authority over that person. Any person who has performed an abortion and against whom judgment has been rendered pursuant to an action under paragraph (a) is subject to an automatic suspension of the person's professional license for at least one year and that license shall be reinstated only after the person's professional board requires compliance with this section by all board licensees. new text end new text begin (c) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to hold the mother of the born-alive infant criminally or civilly liable for the actions of a physician, nurse, or other licensed health care provider in violation of this section to which the mother did not give her consent. new text end new text begin Subd. 1h. new text end new text begin Protection of privacy in court proceedings. new text end new text begin In every civil action brought under this section, the court must determine whether any female upon whom an abortion has been performed or attempted may be identified by initials or pseudonym pursuant to the Minnesota Rules of Civil Procedure. If the court determines that the female may be identified by initials or pseudonym, the court must notify the parties, witnesses, and counsel; permit confidential filings; and exclude individuals from hearings to the extent necessary to safeguard the female's identity from public disclosure. The court must issue a written order with specific findings explaining why the female is entitled to identification by initials or pseudonym, why the order is essential to that end, how the order is narrowly tailored to serve that interest, and why no reasonable, less restrictive alternative exists. This subdivision may not be construed to conceal the identity of the plaintiff or of the witnesses from the defendant. new text end new text begin Subd. 1i. new text end new text begin Life of the mother. new text end new text begin Nothing in this section prevents a health care provider from taking action necessary to save the life of the mother. new text end new text begin Subd. 1j. new text end new text begin Severability. new text end new text begin If any one or more provision, section, subdivision, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this section or the application of it to any person or circumstance is found to be unconstitutional, it is declared to be severable and the remainder of this section shall remain effective notwithstanding the unconstitutionality. The legislature intends that it would have passed this section, and each provision, section, subdivision, sentence, clause, phrase, or word regardless of the fact that any one provision, section, subdivision, sentence, clause, phrase, or word is declared unconstitutional. new text end new text begin Subd. 1k. new text end new text begin Short title. new text end new text begin This section may be cited as the "Born-Alive Infants Protection Act." new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to causes of action occurring on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 645.44, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Person. "Person" may extend and be applied to bodies politic and corporate, and to partnerships and other unincorporated associations.new text begin Person includes every infant human being who is born alive at any stage of development.new text end